District of Columbia statutes.
22-3012

State of mind proof requirement.

In a prosecution under §§ 22-3008 to 22-3010, prosecuted alone or in conjunction with charges under § 22-3018 or § 22-403, the government need not prove that the defendant knew the child’s age or the age difference between himself or herself and the child.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 211, 42 DCR 53

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4112.